Illinois, session 104th, HB588.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 1.01 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/1.01)  (from Ch. 102, par. 41.01)7    Sec. 1.01. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the Open Meetings Act. 9(Source: P.A. 82-378.)